District of Columbia statutes.
38-1201.02

Declaration of purpose.

It is the intent of Congress to authorize a public land-grant university through the reorganization of the existing local institutions of public postsecondary education in the District of Columbia. It is the clear and specific intent of the Congress that vocational and technological education, as well as liberal arts, sciences, teacher education, and graduate and postgraduate studies, within the University be given at all times its proper priority in terms of funding with other units within the University, and that the land-grant funds be utilized by the University in accordance with the provisions of the Act of July 2, 1862 (7 U.S.C. §§ 301 to 305 , 307 , and 308 ) (known as the First Morrill Act).

History

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1423, Pub. L. 93-471, title I, § 102

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1501.
1973 Ed., § 31-1701.

Editor's Notes

Intent of Council: Section 2 of the Act of September 9, 1975, D.C. Law 1-12, and § 2 of the Act of November 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, both provided that it was the intent of the Council of the District of Columbia to approve the Congressional intent expressed in this section, and to provide a range of programs and studies designed to reach the widest possible number of citizens and residents of the District of Columbia.

Nonresident students: Public Law 102-111, 105 Stat. 563, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1992, provided that the public education appropriation shall not be available to subsidize the education of nonresidents of the District of Columbia at the University of the District of Columbia, unless the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia adopts, for the fiscal year ending September 30, 1992, a tuition rate schedule that will establish the tuition rate for nonresident students at a level no lower than the nonresident tuition rate charged at comparable public institutions of higher education in the metropolitan area.

Award of funds: Section 139 of Pub. L. 101-168, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1990, provided that of the funds appropriated in Pub. L. 100-202 for carrying out part B of title VII of the Higher Education Act that remain available for obligation, $6,700,000 shall be awarded without regard to § 701(B), § 721(B), and § 721(C) of said Act to the consortium of institutions of higher education in the Washington, D.C. metropolitan area for the purpose of constructing and equipping an academic research library to link the library and information resources of the universities participating in the consortium.

Establishment of District of Columbia Advisory Committee on Education: See Mayor’s Order 89-256, November 7, 1989.

Appropriations authorized: Public Law 104-194, 110 Stat. 2359, the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1997, provided $69,801,000 and 917 full-time equivalent positions (including $38,479,000 and 572 full-time equivalent positions from local funds, $11,747,000 and 156 full-time equivalent positions from Federal funds, and $19,575,000 and 189 full-time equivalent positions from other funds) for the University of the District of Columbia; provided, that not to exceed $2,500 for the President of the University of the District of Columbia shall be available for expenditures for official purposes.